Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 8 DISABILITY AND SURVIVOR BENEFITS
31-31-810. Employer liability - statewide standard health history form.

The employer of a member shall be liable for the total payment of benefits awarded under this part 8 if the board determines that:

The member's occupational or total disability existed at the commencement of employment by the employer, or the occupational or total disability is the proximate consequence or result of a medical condition that existed at the commencement of employment by the employer, and such employment commenced on or after September 1, 1989;

The employment was not ordered by a court; and

The employer failed to require the member to complete and file the health form required by subsection (1)(c) of this section.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(b) is effective until January 1, 2023.] The board shall enforce a claim for repayment against the employer by either increasing the contribution of the employer under section 31-31-402 (2) or by the commencement and prosecution of a civil action. The choice of remedies shall be in the sole discretion of the board.

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(b) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

The board shall enforce a claim for repayment against the employer by either increasing the contribution of the employer under part 3 of article 31.5 of this title 31 or by the commencement and prosecution of a civil action. The choice of remedies shall be in the sole discretion of the board.

Every newly hired member shall complete a health history on the statewide standard health history form, described in subsection (1)(c)(III) of this section.

Every employer shall require completion of the statewide standard health history form by the newly hired member within thirty days of the first date of employment. The completed form shall be filed with the fire and police pension association within sixty days from commencement of employment if filed by the employer after completion.

The board shall adopt, pursuant to the authority granted it by section 31-31-202 (1)(j), a statewide standard health history form. The board may revise the form from time to time and may adopt an electronic format for completing and filing the form.

Any member who fraudulently conceals any material fact concerning health history when completing the form may be disqualified from receiving an award of disability benefits under this section if the board determines that the condition concealed by the member proximately caused the total or occupational disability.

Any member shall be ineligible for disability benefits with respect to an occupational or total disability that is the proximate consequence or result of a pre-existing and permanent medical condition.

The employer of a deceased member shall be liable for the total payment of benefits awarded under this part 8 if the board determines that:

(I) The member was occupationally or totally disabled at the time of the commencement of employment by the employer, or had a medical condition at the time of the commencement of employment by the employer, and such employment commenced on or after September 1, 1989;

(II) Such preexisting disability or medical condition was the proximate cause of the death of the member;

(III) The employment was not ordered by a court; and

(IV) The employer failed to require the member to complete and file the health form required by subsection (1)(c) of this section.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(b) is effective until January 1, 2023.] The board shall enforce a claim for repayment against the employer either by increasing the contribution of the employer under section 31-31-402 (2) or by the commencement and prosecution of a civil action. The choice of remedies shall be in the sole discretion of the board.

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(b) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

The board shall enforce a claim for repayment against the employer either by increasing the contribution of the employer under part 3 of article 31.5 of this title 31 or by the commencement and prosecution of a civil action. The choice of remedies shall be in the sole discretion of the board.

The surviving spouse and dependent children of a member, whose employer filed the statewide standard health history form pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section, may be disqualified from receiving an award of survivor benefits under this section if the deceased member fraudulently concealed any material fact concerning the member's health history when completing the form, and the board determines that the condition concealed by the member proximately caused the death of the member.

The surviving spouse and dependent children of any member shall be ineligible for an award of survivor benefits in the event the member's death is the proximate consequence or result of a pre-existing and permanent medical condition.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 934, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2016:

(1)(c)(II) amended, (HB 16-1028), ch. 25, p. 60, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(III), (1)(c)(I), (1)(c)(II), (1)(c)(III), (1)(c)(V), (2)(a)(IV), and (2)(c)(II) amended, (HB 18-1056), ch. 116, p. 813, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(1)(b) and (2)(b) amended, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 310, § 18, effective January 1, 2023.

Editor's note:

Provisions of this section were formerly numbered as §§ 31-30-1007 (6) and 31-30-1008 (2).

31-31-811. Funding of death and disability benefits.

Every employer in this state, except those employers covering their employees under social security and those described in section 31-31-802 (2)(b) and (2)(c) who have not elected to be subject to the provisions of this part 8, shall be governed by the provisions of this section. For members who die or are disabled on or after January 1, 1980, the death and disability benefits provided to any member pursuant to this part 8 shall be paid for by state moneys transferred to the fire and police members' benefit investment fund created by section 31-31-301 (1)(a), subject to the limitations imposed by this section. Moneys in the disability and death benefits trust fund created by section 31-31-813 shall not be used for any purpose other than the payment of the death and disability benefits established by this part 8.

The board shall submit an annual actuarial valuation report dated January 1 of the year in which the report is submitted, regarding the benefit liabilities accrued under this part 8 to the state auditor, the legislative audit committee, and the joint budget committee of the general assembly, together with any recommendations concerning such liabilities as accrued.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2020.)

Repealed.

(3.5) (a) To ensure that there is sufficient money to pay death and disability benefits for members hired before January 1, 1997, the state treasurer shall issue warrants to the fire and police pension association on July 1, 2022, and July 1, 2023, in an amount equal to six million six hundred fifty thousand dollars for each warrant. The warrant issued on July 1, 2022, is to be paid from the general fund, and the warrant issued on July 1, 2023, is to be paid from the death and disability payment cash fund created in subsection (3.5)(b) of this section. The board shall deposit this money in the statewide death and disability trust fund created in section 31-31-813.

The death and disability payment cash fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of money transferred to the fund in accordance with subsection (3.5)(b)(II) of this section. In accordance with section 24-36-114 (1), the state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the general fund. The state treasurer shall use the money in the fund for the warrant issued on July 1, 2023, in accordance with subsection (3.5)(a) of this section.

On July 1, 2022, the state treasurer shall transfer six million six hundred fifty thousand dollars from the general fund to the death and disability payment cash fund created in subsection (3.5)(b)(I) of this section.

For each member hired on or after January 1, 1997, who is eligible for the death and disability coverage provided by this part 8, a contribution shall be made to the death and disability account in the fund for the year 2021 in an amount not greater than three percent of the member's salary. Thereafter, the board, based on an annual actuarial valuation, may adjust the contribution rate every year, but in no event may the adjustment for any one-year period exceed two-tenths of one percent of the member's salary. Any employer and any local pension board or authority shall provide such information as may be required by the board in order to complete the annual actuarial valuations. The actuary appointed by the board may utilize either the entry age-normal cost method or the aggregate cost method for purposes of the study required by this subsection (4). Any unfunded accrued liability shall be funded over a period not to exceed thirty years. The actuarial study shall not include any consideration of a cost of living adjustment to benefits awarded to members who are occupationally disabled. Payments shall be made by the employer and are due no later than ten days following the date of payment of salary to the member. The payments required by this section are subject to interest if not submitted when due. Any decision regarding whether the contribution required by this subsection (4) shall be assessed against the employer or the member, or shall in some manner be assessed jointly against the employer and the member, will be made at the local level utilizing the usual process for determining employee benefits. If it is not already part of the usual process for determining employee benefits, the employer shall confer with the employees or their representative prior to making a determination on how the contribution will be assessed.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 935, § 1, effective May 23; (2) and (3) amended and (4) added, pp. 1340, 1341, §§ 5, 6, effective June 1.

L. 2001:

(2)(b)(II) and (4) amended and (2)(b)(III) added, p. 426, § 16, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 197, § 23, effective March 31.

L. 2007:

(4) amended, p. 274, § 3, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(2)(b)(III) amended, p. 1269, § 8, effective August 5.

L. 2015:

(4) amended, (SB 15-027), ch. 9, p. 21, § 5, effective August 5.

L. 2020:

(2) and (4) amended and (3) repealed, (HB 20-1044), ch. 105, p. 413, § 11, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(3.5) added, (SB 22-036), ch. 262, p. 1923, § 1, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

Provisions of this section were formerly numbered as §§ 31-30-1013 (3), 31-30-1014 (2)(c), and 31-30-1015.

31-31-812. Military leave of absence.

Authorized leave of absence shall include leave for military service as allowed by the board. The board shall adopt rules regarding authorized leave of absence for military service, including, but not limited to:

Limits on the length of the term of the leave of absence;

Assessment of costs for coverage during the leave of absence; and

Any other matter that the board deems necessary for coverage under the statewide death and disability plan.

The benefits payable to the member, the surviving spouse of the member, and the dependent children of the member pursuant to this part 8 shall be reduced by an amount that is the actuarial equivalent of any military benefit received as a result of the death or disability of a member while on authorized leave for military service whether the benefits are paid on a periodic basis or in a lump sum.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 185, § 14, effective October 1.

31-31-813. Statewide death and disability trust fund - created.

There is hereby created a disability and death benefits trust fund into which contributions for death and disability benefits, including state contributions made pursuant to section 31-31-811, shall be deposited. The benefits provided by this part 8, together with the expenses of administering said part, shall be paid from the fund.

The assets of the disability and death benefits trust fund shall be invested in the fire and police members' benefit investment fund.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 197, § 24, effective March 31.

Cross references:

For the fire and police members' investment fund, see part 3 of this article.

31-31-814. Suspension and termination of benefits for noncompliance.

If a member refuses to submit to a medical examination required by the fire and police pension association and authorized by this part 8, fails to provide information necessary for the association to assess eligibility or continuing eligibility for benefits, or obstructs the association from receiving such necessary information, all rights to collect or to begin or maintain any proceeding for the collection of benefits pursuant to this part 8 shall be suspended, and all rights to benefits that accrue and become payable during the period of such refusal or obstruction shall be barred. If the member continues to refuse to submit to the examination or to provide the additional information after direction by the board or its hearing officer or in any way obstructs the same, the board shall terminate the benefit.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 160, § 1, effective August 5.

31-31-815. Amendment of plan provisions.

The board may amend the provisions for disability and survivor benefits under this part 8 as it deems prudent and necessary to comply with state and federal law or as it deems necessary to efficiently administer the benefits under the plan.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1031), ch. 68, p. 237, § 4, effective August 8.